Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4021
Principles of law and equity.

Unless displaced by a
provision of the Nebraska Uniform Power of Attorney Act, the principles of
law and equity supplement the act.

Laws 2012, LB1113, § 21.